New Jersey, session 222, S232.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.   If an appropriate board panel revokes parole and returns an adult parolee to custody, the future parole eligibility date shall be no more than nine months from the date of that adult parolees return to custody when one of the following parole violations is the basis for return to custody pursuant to subsection b. of section 16 of P.L.1979, c.441 (C.30:4-123.60): (1)  failure to report to the parole officer assigned to supervise the parolee, as implemented by regulation, provided that the inmate is declared by the district parole supervisor or designated representative of the commission, as appropriate, to be missing from parole supervision; (2)  failure to comply with any special condition of parole imposed pursuant to regulation promulgated by the Department of Corrections; or (3)  failure to refrain from the use of a controlled dangerous substance or controlled dangerous substance analog as defined in N.J.S.2C:35-2, provided that a two-member parole board panel determines, in its discretion, that the inmate is addicted to that controlled dangerous substance or analog. b.   The future parole eligibility date under subsection a. of this section may be increased or decreased by up to three months in the case of an adult parolee if, in the opinion of the appropriate board panel, the circumstances of the parole violation and the characteristics and past record of the parolee warrant an adjustment. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.